pt-BR: Tipo de máquina de cardio compatível: Corda naval; Elíptico; Bicicleta ergométrica; Minicama elástica / jump; Reformer de pilates; Máquina de remo; Simulador de esqui; Trenó; Simulador de escada / stepper; Esteira; Universal; Outro
ru: Совместимый тип кардиотренажера: Боевой канат; Эллиптический тренажёр; Велотренажёр; Мини-батут / ребаундер; Реформер для пилатеса; Гребной тренажёр; Лыжный тренажёр; Сани; Степпер / климбер; Беговая дорожка; Универсальный; Другое
fr: Type d'appareil de cardio compatible: Corde ondulatoire; Vélo elliptique; Vélo d’appartement; Mini-trampoline / rebondisseur; Reformer Pilates; Rameur; Simulateur de ski; Traîneau; Stepper / simulateur d’escaliers; Tapis de course; Universel; Autre
bg-BG: Съвместим тип кардио уред: Бойно въже; Кростренажор; Велоергометър; Мини батут / ребаундър; Пилатес реформър; Гребен тренажор; Ски тренажор; Шейна за бутане; Степер / тренажор за стълби; Пътека за бягане; Универсален; Друго
tr: Uyumlu kardiyo cihazı tipi: Savaş halatı; Eliptik bisiklet; Kondisyon bisikleti; Mini trambolin / egzersiz trambolini; Pilates reformer; Kürek makinesi; Kayak makinesi; Kızak; Step aleti / merdiven aleti; Koşu bandı; Evrensel; Diğer
es: Tipo de máquina cardiovascular compatible: Cuerda de batalla; Entrenador elíptico; Bicicleta estática; Minitrampolín/rebotador; Reformador de pilates; Máquina de remo; Máquina de esquí; Trineo; Escaladora/máquina de subir escaleras; Caminadora; Universal; Otro
pt-PT: Tipo de equipamento de cardio compatível: Corda naval; Bicicleta elíptica; Bicicleta estática; Minitrampolim/rebounder; Reformer de Pilates; Máquina de remo; Máquina de esqui; Trenó de treino; Máquina de steps/escadas; Passadeira; Universal; Outra
sv: Kompatibel träningsmaskinstyp: Battle rope; Crosstrainer; Motionscykel; Minitrampolin/studsmatta; Pilates-reformer; Roddmaskin; Stakmaskin; Träningssläde; Trappmaskin/stepper; Löpband; Universell; Annat
nb: Kompatibel kardiomaskin-type: Battle rope; Ellipsemaskin; Trimsykkel; Minitrampoline / rebounder; Pilates reformer; Romaskin; Skimaskin; Slede; Trappemaskin / stepmaskin; Tredemølle; Universell; Annet
de: Kompatibles Herz-Kreislauf-Gerät: Battle Rope; Ellipsentrainer; Heimtrainer; Minitrampolin/Rebounder; Pilates-Reformer; Rudergerät; Skiergometer; Fitness-Schlitten; Stepper/Treppensteiger; Laufband; Universal; Sonstige
vi: Loại máy tập cardio tương thích: Dây thừng tập thể lực; Máy tập toàn thân; Xe đạp tập thể dục; Bạt nhún mini / bạt nhún thể lực; Máy tập Pilates reformer; Máy tập chèo thuyền; Máy tập trượt tuyết; Xe đẩy tạ; Máy tập bước chân / máy tập leo cầu thang; Máy chạy bộ; Đa năng; Khác
lt-LT: Suderinamo tipo kardiotreniruoklis: Kovos virvė; Elipsinis treniruoklis; Dviratis treniruoklis; Mini batutas / atšokamasis batutas; „Pilates“ reformeris; Irklavimo treniruoklis; Slidinėjimo treniruoklis; Rogės; Žingsniuoklis / laiptų treniruoklis; Bėgimo takelis; Universalus; Kita
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ kardio stroja: Bojové lano; Eliptický trenažér; Stacionárny bicykel; Minitrampolína/rebounder; Pilates reformer; Veslovací trenažér; Lyžiarsky trenažér; Posilňovacie sane; Stepper/schodiskový trenažér; Bežecký pás; Univerzálne; Iné
pl: Zgodny typ urządzeń do ćwiczeń aerobowych: Lina treningowa; Trenażer eliptyczny; Rower treningowy; Mini trampolina / trampolina fitness; Reformer do pilatesu; Wioślarz; Trenażer narciarski; Sanie treningowe; Stepper / schody treningowe; Bieżnia; Uniwersalne; Inne
zh-TW: 相容心肺訓練機類型: 戰繩; 橢圓機; 健身車; 迷你彈跳床 / 回彈網; 皮拉提斯核心床; 划船機; 滑雪機; 雪橇; 踏步機 / 階梯機; 跑步機; 通用; 其他
ro-RO: Tip de aparat cardio compatibil: Sfoară de antrenament; Bicicletă eliptică; Bicicletă de fitness; Mini trambulină / rebounder; Pilates reformer; Aparat de vâslit; Aparat de schi; Sanie de antrenament; Stepper / aparat de urcat scări; Bandă de alergat; Universal; Altele
ko: 호환 유산소 운동 기구 유형: 배틀 로프; 일립티컬 트레이너; 실내용 자전거; 미니 트램펄린/리바운더; 필라테스 리포머; 로잉 머신; 스키 머신; 슬레드; 스텝퍼/스테어 클라이머; 러닝머신; 범용; 기타
hu: Kompatibilis kardiógép típusa: Csatakötél (battle rope); Elliptikus tréner; Szobakerékpár; Mini trambulin / rebounder; Pilates reformer; Evezőpad; Sítréner; Tolószán; Lépcsőzőgép / taposógép; Futópad; Univerzális; Egyéb
da: Kompatibel kardiomaskinetype: Battle rope; Crosstrainer; Motionscykel; Minitrampolin / rebounder; Pilates-reformer; Romaskine; Skimaskine; Slæde; Stepmaskine / trappemaskine; Løbebånd; Universal; Andet
th: ประเภทเครื่องออกกำลังกายแบบคาร์ดิโอที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: Battle rope; เครื่องเดินวงรี; จักรยานออกกำลังกาย; มินิทรัมโพลีน/รีบาวน์เดอร์; พิลาทิสรีฟอร์มเมอร์; เครื่องกรรเชียงบก; เครื่องเล่นสกี; Sled; เครื่องสเต็ปเปอร์/ปีนบันได; ลู่วิ่งไฟฟ้า; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di macchina cardio compatibile: Battle rope; Bicicletta ellittica; Cyclette; Mini trampolino / rimbalzatore; Reformer per pilates; Vogatore; Macchina da sci; Slitta; Stepper / simulatore di scale; Tapis roulant; Universale; Altro
cs: Typ kompatibilního kardio stroje: Posilovací lano; Eliptický trenažér; Rotoped; Mini trampolína / rebounder; Pilates reformer; Veslovací trenažér; Lyžařský trenažér; Sáně; Stepper / schodový trenažér; Běžecký pás; Univerzální; Jiné
ja: 対応有酸素運動マシンタイプ: バトルロープ; エリプティカルトレーナー; エクササイズバイク; ミニトランポリン / リバウンダー; ピラティスリフォーマー; ローイングマシン; スキーマシン; スレッド; ステッパー / ステアクライマー; トレッドミル; 汎用; その他
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta kardio naprave: Bojna vrv; Eliptični trenažer; Sobno kolo; Mini trampolin/rebounder; Reformer za pilates; Veslaška naprava; Smučarski trenažer; Sani; Steper/simulator vzpenjanja po stopnicah; Tekaška steza; Univerzalno; Drugo
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta sprave za cardio: Borbeno uže; Eliptični trenažer; Sobni bicikl; Mini trampolin / rebounder; Pilates reformer; Sprava za veslanje; Skijaški trenažer; Trening sanjke; Steper / sprava za penjanje; Traka za trčanje; Univerzalno; Ostalo
fi: Yhteensopiva kuntolaitteen tyyppi: Taisteluköysi; Crosstrainer; Kuntopyörä; Minitrampoliini/rebounder; Pilates reformer; Soutulaite; Hiihtolaite; Kuntokelkka; Stepperi/porraskone; Juoksumatto; Universaali; Muu
en: Compatible cardio machine type: Battle rope; Elliptical trainer; Exercise bike; Mini trampoline / rebounder; Pilates reformer; Rowing machine; Ski machine; Sled; Stepper / stair climber; Treadmill; Universal; Other
zh-CN: 适用有氧运动器械类型: 战绳; 椭圆机; 健身车; 迷你蹦床/回弹器; 普拉提核心床; 划船机; 滑雪机; 雪橇车; 踏步机/攀爬机; 跑步机; 通用; 其他
nl: Compatibel type cardioapparaat: Battle rope; Crosstrainer; Hometrainer; Minitrampoline / rebounder; Pilates reformer; Roeitrainer; Skitrainer; Slee; Stepper / stairclimber; Hardloopband; Universeel; Overig
el: Συμβατός τύπος καρδιομηχανήματος: Σχοινί μάχης; Ελλειπτικό μηχάνημα; Ποδήλατο γυμναστικής; Μίνι τραμπολίνο / ριμπάουντερ; Pilates reformer; Κωπηλατικό μηχάνημα; Μηχάνημα σκι; Έλκηθρο; Stepper / μηχάνημα σκαλοπατιών; Διάδρομος γυμναστικής; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο